Utah statutes.
78A-7-215.   Monthly reports to court administrator and governing body.

(1)  Every justice court shall file monthly with the state court administrator a report of the judicial business of the judge.  The report shall be on forms supplied by the state court administrator.

(2)  The report shall state the number of criminal and small claims actions filed, the dispositions entered, and other information as specified in the forms.

(3)  A copy of the report shall be furnished by the justice court to the person or office in the county, city, or town designated by the governing body to receive the report.



Amended by Chapter 205, 2012 General Session

